Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3128.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21-28.11 of the General Laws entitled "The Rhode Island Cannabis
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
21-28.11-31.1. Cannabis safety -- Responsible usage.
(a) Annually, the cannabis control commission shall appropriate the sum of two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000) to the substance use mental health leadership council (the
“SUMHLC”) to address hazardous and underage cannabis use, including alternatives, education,
and environmental strategies.
(b) Annually, the cannabis control commission shall appropriate the sum of five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) to the SUMHLC for a public facing web and social media presence
and ongoing media campaigns.
(c) Annually, by October 1, the SUMHLC shall report on the usage of each appropriation
grant to the president of the senate and speaker of the house.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006149
========